Louisiana, session 2025s1, HB3.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part I-B of Chapter 5 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statues of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 18:419, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Part I-B. SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR CERTAIN ELECTIONS HELD IN 2026
§419. Qualifying fees for candidates for congressional office in 2026
Notwithstanding R.S. 18:464(B)(1) or any other provision of law to the
contrary, the qualifying fee for a candidate in a primary election in 2026 for United
States senator or representative is six hundred dollars.